Arkansas, session 2025, HB1792.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 11, Chapter 5, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
11-5-119. Unpaid leave for Veterans Day — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Veteran" means a former member of the United States Armed
Forces, or a former or current member of an Arkansas Reserve or Arkansas
National Guard unit who was called into active military service of the United
States as defined in the Military Code of Arkansas, § 12-60-101 et seq.; and
(2) "Veterans Day" means the federal holiday observed annually
on November 11.
(b) A private employer that does not otherwise provide for paid
holiday leave for Veterans Day shall allow an employee who is also a veteran
to have the entirety of Veterans Day as unpaid leave if the employee provides
the employer with:
(1) Written notice, submitted at least one (1) month in advance
of the date, of his or her intent to have the entirety of Veterans Day as
*CRH266*
03/13/2025 3:47:52 PM CRH266

HB1792
unpaid leave; and
(2) Proof of veteran status, including without limitation a
Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty, generally referred to
as a "DD Form 214", or other comparable certificate of discharge from the
United States Armed Forces.
(c) The employer shall not reject the request of an employee who is
also a veteran unless the employer can demonstrate that the employee's
absence will:
(1) Adversely impact the public health and safety; or
(2) Cause significant economic or operational disruption to the
employer, as determined by the Department of Labor and Licensing.
(d) This section does not prohibit an employer from allowing the
employer's other employees, whether or not the employees are veterans, to
have the entirety of Veterans Day as a paid holiday.
(e) The Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing may
promulgate rules to implement this section.




















03/13/2025 3:47:52 PM CRH266